Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB211.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(2) of the act of December 20, 1996 (P.L.1492, No.191), known as the Medical Foods Insurance Coverage Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:* * *(2) Lacking in these aminoacidopathies is the body's ability to process or metabolize amino acids, and, if left untreated or without proper therapeutic management, these disorders cause severe [mental retardation] intellectual disabilities and chronic physical disabilities.123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0211PN0148 - 2 - 12